Utah statutes.
75-6-111.   Financial institution protection -- Payment of trust account.
Any trust account may be paid, on request, to any trustee. Unless the
financial institution has received written notice that the beneficiary has a
vested interest not dependent upon his surviving the trustee, payment may be
made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased trustee if proof of
death is presented to the financial institution showing that his decedent was
the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as trustee or
beneficiary. Payment may be made, on request, to the beneficiary upon
presentation to the financial institution of proof of death showing that the
beneficiary or beneficiaries survived all persons named as trustees.
